Illinois, session 104th, HB3854.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 5Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 6changing Sections 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-7, 2-10, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 73-6, 3-9, 3A-2, 3A-3, 3A-5, 3C-2, 3C-3, 3C-7, 3E-2, and 3E-3 as 8follows: 9    (225 ILCS 410/2-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-2)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 2-2. Licensure as a barber; qualifications. A person 12is qualified to receive a license as a barber if that person 13has applied in writing on forms prescribed by the Department, 14has paid the required fees, and:15        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and16        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 17    providing secondary education, or the recognized 18    equivalent of such a certificate, or persons who are 19    beyond the age of compulsory school attendance; and20        c. Has graduated from a school of barbering or school 21    of cosmetology approved by the Department, having 22    completed a total of 1,200 1500 hours in the study of 23    barbering extending over a period of not less than 9   HB3854- 2 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    months nor more than 3 years. A school of barbering may, at 2    its discretion, consistent with the rules of the 3    Department, accept up to 800 1,000 hours of cosmetology 4    school training at a recognized cosmetology school toward 5    the 1,200 1500 hour course requirement of barbering. Time 6    spent in such study under the laws of another state or 7    territory of the United States or of a foreign country or 8    province shall be credited toward the period of study 9    required by the provisions of this paragraph; and10        d. Has passed an examination caused to be conducted by 11    the Department or its designated testing service to 12    determine fitness to receive a license as a barber; and13        e. Has met all other requirements of this Act.14(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 410/2-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-3)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 2-3. Licensure as a barber by a cosmetology school 18graduate. A person is qualified to receive a license as a 19barber if that person has applied in writing on forms provided 20by the Department, paid the required fees, and:21        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and22        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 23    providing secondary education, or the recognized 24    equivalent of such a certificate, or persons who are 25    beyond the age of compulsory school attendance; and  HB3854- 3 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1        c. Has graduated from a cosmetology school approved by 2    the Department having completed a minimum of 1,200 1500 3    hours in the study of cosmetology; and4        d. Has graduated from a school of barbering or 5    cosmetology approved by the Department having completed a 6    minimum of 400 500 additional hours in the study of 7    barbering extending over a period of no less than 3 months 8    nor more than one year. Time spent in such study under the 9    laws of another state or territory of the United States or 10    of a foreign country or province shall be credited toward 11    the period of study required by the provisions of this 12    paragraph; and13        e. Has passed an examination caused to be conducted by 14    the Department, or its designated testing service, to 15    determine fitness to receive a license as a barber; and16        f. Has met any other requirements set forth in this 17    Act.18(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 19    (225 ILCS 410/2-4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-4)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 2-4. Licensure as a barber teacher; qualifications. A 22person is qualified to receive a license as a barber teacher if 23that person files an application on forms provided by the 24Department, pays the required fee, and:25        a. Is at least 18 years of age;  HB3854- 4 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1        b. Has graduated from high school or its equivalent;2        c. Has a current license as a barber or cosmetologist;3        d. Has graduated from a barber school or school of 4    cosmetology approved by the Department having:5            (1) completed a total of 400 500 hours in barber 6        teacher training extending over a period of not less 7        than 3 months nor more than 2 years and has had 3 years 8        of practical experience as a licensed barber;9            (2) completed a total of 800 1,000 hours of barber 10        teacher training extending over a period of not less 11        than 6 months nor more than 2 years; or12            (3) completed the cosmetology teacher training as 13        specified in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of 14        Section 3-4 of this Act and completed a supplemental 15        barbering course as established by rule; 16        e. Has passed an examination authorized by the 17    Department to determine fitness to receive a license as a 18    barber teacher or a cosmetology teacher; and19        f. Has met any other requirements set forth in this 20    Act.21    An applicant who is issued a license as a barber teacher is 22not required to maintain a barber license in order to practice 23barbering as defined in this Act.24(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 2599-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   HB3854- 5 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/2-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-7)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 2-7. Examination of applicants. The Department shall 4hold examinations of applicants for licensure as barbers and 5teachers of barbering at such times and places as it may 6determine. Upon request, the examinations shall be 7administered in Spanish.8    Each applicant shall be given a written examination 9testing both theoretical and practical knowledge of the 10following subjects insofar as they are related and applicable 11to the practice of barber science and art: (1) anatomy, (2) 12physiology, (3) skin diseases, (4) hygiene and sanitation, (5) 13barber history, (6) this Act and the rules for the 14administration of this Act, (7) hair cutting and styling, (8) 15shaving, shampooing, and permanent waving, (9) massaging, (10) 16bleaching, tinting, and coloring, and (11) implements.17    The examination of applicants for licensure as a barber 18teacher shall include: (a) practice of barbering and styling, 19(b) theory of barbering, (c) methods of teaching, and (d) 20school management.21    An applicant for licensure as a barber who has completed 22960 1,200 hours in the study of barbering may take the 23examination. If an applicant for licensure as a barber fails 24to pass 3 examinations conducted by the Department, the 25applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 26furnish evidence of not less than 200 250 hours of additional   HB3854- 6 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1study of barbering in an approved school of barbering or 2cosmetology since the applicant last took the examination. If 3an applicant for licensure as a barber teacher fails to pass 3 4examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant shall, 5before taking a subsequent examination, furnish evidence of 6not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in teaching 7methodology and educational psychology in an approved school 8of barbering or cosmetology since the applicant last took the 9examination. An applicant who fails to pass the fourth 10examination shall not again be admitted to an examination 11unless: (i) in the case of an applicant for licensure as a 12barber, the applicant again takes and completes a program of 131,200 1,500 hours in the study of barbering in an approved 14school of barbering or cosmetology extending over a period 15that commences after the applicant fails to pass the fourth 16examination and that is not less than 8 months nor more than 7 17consecutive years in duration; or (ii) in the case of an 18applicant for licensure as a barber teacher, the applicant 19again takes and completes a program of 800 1,000 hours of 20teacher training in an approved school of barbering or 21cosmetology, except that if the applicant had 2 years of 22practical experience as a licensed barber within the 5 years 23preceding the initial examination taken by the applicant, the 24applicant must again take and complete a program of 400 500 25hours of teacher training in an approved school of barbering 26or cosmetology. The requirements for remedial training set   HB3854- 7 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1forth in this Section may be waived in whole or in part by the 2Department upon proof to the Department that the applicant has 3demonstrated competence to again sit for the examination. The 4Department shall adopt rules establishing standards by which 5this determination shall be made. 6    This Act does not prohibit the practice as a barber or 7barber teacher by one who has applied in writing to the 8Department, in form and substance satisfactory to the 9Department, for a license and has complied with all the 10provisions of this Act in order to qualify for a license except 11the passing of an examination, until: (a) the expiration of 6 12months after the filing of such written application, or (b) 13the decision of the Department that the applicant has failed 14to pass an examination within 6 months or failed without an 15approved excuse to take an examination conducted within 6 16months by the Department, or (c) the withdrawal of the 17application.18(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15; 100-642, eff. 1-1-19; 19100-934, eff. 1-1-19.) 20    (225 ILCS 410/2-10)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 2-10. Licensed cosmetologist seeking license as a 23barber. A licensed cosmetologist who submits to the Department 24an application for licensure as a barber must meet all 25requirements of this Act for licensure as a barber, except   HB3854- 8 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1that such applicant shall be given credit for hours of 2instruction completed for his or her cosmetologist license in 3subjects that are common to both barbering and cosmetology and 4shall complete an additional 400 500 hours of instruction in 5subjects not within the scope of practice of a cosmetologist. 6The Department shall provide for the implementation of this 7provision by rule.8(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 9    (225 ILCS 410/3-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-2)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 3-2. Licensure; qualifications. 12    (1) A person is qualified to receive a license as a 13cosmetologist who has filed an application on forms provided 14by the Department, pays the required fees, and: 15        a. Is at least l6 years of age; and 16        b. Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 17    or has received a certificate of graduation from a school 18    providing secondary education, or the recognized 19    equivalent of that certificate; and 20        c. Has graduated from a school of cosmetology approved 21    by the Department, having completed a program of 1,200 22    1,500 hours in the study of cosmetology extending over a 23    period of not less than 8 months nor more than 7 24    consecutive years. A school of cosmetology may, at its 25    discretion, consistent with the rules of the Department,   HB3854- 9 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    accept up to 800 1,000 hours of barber school training at a 2    recognized barber school toward the 1,200 1,500 hour 3    program requirement of cosmetology. Time spent in such 4    study under the laws of another state or territory of the 5    United States or of a foreign country or province shall be 6    credited toward the period of study required by the 7    provisions of this paragraph; and 8        d. Has passed an examination authorized by the 9    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 10    as a cosmetologist; and 11        e. Has met any other requirements of this Act.12    (2) (Blank).13(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 410/3-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-3)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 3-3. Licensure as a cosmetologist by a barber school 17graduate. A person is qualified to receive a license as a 18cosmetologist if that person has filed an application on forms 19provided by the Department, has paid the required fees, and:20        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and21        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 22    providing secondary education, or the recognized 23    equivalent of such a certificate, or is beyond the age of 24    compulsory school attendance; and25        c. Has graduated from a school of barbering approved   HB3854- 10 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    by the Department having completed 1,200 1500 hours in the 2    study of barbering, and a minimum of 400 500 additional 3    hours in the study of cosmetology extending over a period 4    of no less than 3 months nor more than one year. Time spent 5    in such study under the laws of another state or territory 6    of the United States or of a foreign country or province 7    shall be credited toward the period of study required by 8    the provisions of this paragraph; and9        d. Has passed an examination authorized by the 10    Department to determine fitness to receive a license as a 11    cosmetologist; and12        e. Has met any other requirements of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 410/3-4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-4)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 3-4. Licensure as cosmetology teacher or cosmetology 17clinic teacher; qualifications.18    (a) A person is qualified to receive license as a 19cosmetology teacher if that person has applied in writing on 20forms provided by the Department, has paid the required fees, 21and: 22        (1) is at least 18 years of age; 23        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent; 24        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist; 25        (4) has either: (i) completed a program of 400 500   HB3854- 11 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of 2    cosmetology and had 2 years of practical experience as a 3    licensed cosmetologist within 5 years preceding the 4    examination; (ii) completed a program of 800 1,000 hours 5    of teacher training in a licensed school of cosmetology; 6    or (iii) completed the barber teacher training as 7    specified in subsection (d) of Section 2-4 of this Act and 8    completed a supplemental cosmetology course as established 9    by rule; 10        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 11    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 12    as a cosmetology teacher or barber teacher; and 13        (6) has met any other requirements of this Act.14    An individual who receives a license as a cosmetology 15teacher shall not be required to maintain an active 16cosmetology license in order to practice cosmetology as 17defined in this Act.18    (b) A person is qualified to receive a license as a 19cosmetology clinic teacher if he or she has applied in writing 20on forms provided by the Department, has paid the required 21fees, and: 22        (1) is at least 18 years of age; 23        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent; 24        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist; 25        (4) has (i) completed a program of 200 250 hours of 26    clinic teacher training in a licensed school of   HB3854- 12 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    cosmetology or (ii) within 5 years preceding the 2    examination, has obtained a minimum of 2 years of 3    practical experience working at least 30 full-time hours 4    per week as a licensed cosmetologist and has completed an 5    instructor's institute of 16 20 hours, as prescribed by 6    the Department, prior to submitting an application for 7    examination; 8        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 9    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 10    as a cosmetology teacher; and 11        (6) has met any other requirements of this Act.12    The Department shall not issue any new cosmetology clinic 13teacher licenses after January 1, 2009. Any person issued a 14license as a cosmetology clinic teacher before January 1, 152009, may renew the license after that date under this Act and 16that person may continue to renew the license or have the 17license restored during his or her lifetime, subject only to 18the renewal or restoration requirements for the license under 19this Act; however, such licensee and license shall remain 20subject to the provisions of this Act, including, but not 21limited to, provisions concerning renewal, restoration, fees, 22continuing education, discipline, administration, and 23enforcement. 24(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 25    (225 ILCS 410/3-6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-6)  HB3854- 13 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 3-6. Examination. The Department shall authorize 3examinations of applicants for licensure as cosmetologists and 4teachers of cosmetology at the times and places it may 5determine. The Department may provide by rule for the 6administration of the examination prior to the completion of 7the applicant's program of training as required in Section 83-2, 3-3, or 3-4. Notwithstanding Section 3-2, 3-3, or 3-4, an 9applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist who has completed 10960 1,200 hours in the study of cosmetology may take the 11examination. If an applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist 12fails to pass 3 examinations conducted by the Department, the 13applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 14furnish evidence of not less than 200 250 hours of additional 15study of cosmetology in an approved school of cosmetology 16since the applicant last took the examination. If an applicant 17for licensure as a cosmetology teacher fails to pass 3 18examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant shall, 19before taking a subsequent examination, furnish evidence of 20not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in teaching 21methodology and educational psychology in an approved school 22of cosmetology since the applicant last took the examination. 23An applicant who fails to pass the fourth examination shall 24not again be admitted to an examination unless: (i) in the case 25of an applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist, the 26applicant again takes and completes a program of 1,200 1500   HB3854- 14 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1hours in the study of cosmetology in an approved school of 2cosmetology extending over a period that commences after the 3applicant fails to pass the fourth examination and that is not 4less than 8 months nor more than 7 consecutive years in 5duration; (ii) in the case of an applicant for licensure as a 6cosmetology teacher, the applicant again takes and completes a 7program of 800 1000 hours of teacher training in an approved 8school of cosmetology, except that if the applicant had 2 9years of practical experience as a licensed cosmetologist 10within the 5 years preceding the initial examination taken by 11the applicant, the applicant must again take and complete a 12program of 400 500 hours of teacher training in an approved 13school of cosmetology, esthetics, or nail technology; or (iii) 14in the case of an applicant for licensure as a cosmetology 15clinic teacher, the applicant again takes and completes a 16program of 200 250 hours of clinic teacher training in a 17licensed school of cosmetology or an instructor's institute of 1816 20 hours. The requirements for remedial training set forth 19in this Section may be waived in whole or in part by the 20Department upon proof to the Department that the applicant has 21demonstrated competence to again sit for the examination. The 22Department shall adopt rules establishing the standards by 23which this determination shall be made. Each cosmetology 24applicant shall be given a written examination testing both 25theoretical and practical knowledge, which shall include, but 26not be limited to, questions that determine the applicant's   HB3854- 15 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1knowledge of product chemistry, sanitary rules, sanitary 2procedures, chemical service procedures, hazardous chemicals 3and exposure minimization, knowledge of the anatomy of the 4skin, scalp, hair, and nails as they relate to applicable 5services under this Act and labor and compensation laws.6    The examination of applicants for licensure as a 7cosmetology, esthetics, or nail technology teacher may include 8all of the elements of the exam for licensure as a 9cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician and also 10include teaching methodology, classroom management, record 11keeping, and any other related subjects that the Department in 12its discretion may deem necessary to insure competent 13performance.14    This Act does not prohibit the practice of cosmetology by 15one who has applied in writing to the Department, in form and 16substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as a 17cosmetologist, or the teaching of cosmetology by one who has 18applied in writing to the Department, in form and substance 19satisfactory to the Department, for a license as a cosmetology 20teacher or cosmetology clinic teacher, if the person has 21complied with all the provisions of this Act in order to 22qualify for a license, except the passing of an examination to 23be eligible to receive a license, until: (a) the expiration of 246 months after the filing of the written application, (b) the 25decision of the Department that the applicant has failed to 26pass an examination within 6 months or failed without an   HB3854- 16 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1approved excuse to take an examination conducted within 6 2months by the Department, or (c) the withdrawal of the 3application.4(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15; 100-642, eff. 1-1-19; 5100-934, eff. 1-1-19.) 6    (225 ILCS 410/3-9)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 3-9. Licensed barber seeking license as 9cosmetologist. A licensed barber who submits to the Department 10an application for licensure as a cosmetologist must meet all 11requirements of this Act for licensure as a cosmetologist, 12except that such applicant shall be given credit for hours of 13instruction completed for his or her barber license in 14subjects that are common to both barbering and cosmetology and 15shall complete an additional 400 500 hours of instruction in 16subjects not within the scope of practice of a barber. The 17Department shall provide for the implementation of this 18provision by rule.19(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 20    (225 ILCS 410/3A-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-2)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 3A-2. Licensure as an esthetician; qualifications. A 23person is qualified to receive a license as a licensed 24esthetician if that person has applied in writing on forms   HB3854- 17 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1provided by the Department, paid any required fees, and:2    a. Is at least 16 years of age; and3    b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school providing 4secondary education, or the recognized equivalent of such a 5certificate, or persons who are beyond the age of compulsory 6school attendance; and7    c. Has graduated from a school of cosmetology or esthetics 8approved by the Department, having completed a program of 600 9750 hours in the study of esthetics extending over a period of 10not less than 18 weeks nor more than 4 consecutive years. Time 11spent in such study under the laws of another state or 12territory of the United States or of a foreign country or 13province shall be credited toward the period of study required 14by the provisions of this paragraph; and15    d. Has passed an examination authorized by the Department 16to determine fitness to receive a license as a licensed 17esthetician; and18    e. Has met any other requirements of this Act and rules.19(Source: P.A. 91-863, eff. 7-1-00.) 20    (225 ILCS 410/3A-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-3)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 3A-3. Licensure as an esthetics teacher; 23qualifications. 24    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as an 25esthetics teacher if that person has applied in writing on   HB3854- 18 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1forms supplied by the Department, paid the required fees, and:2        (1) is at least 18 years of age;3        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;4        (3) has a current license as a licensed cosmetologist 5    or esthetician;6        (4) has either: (i) completed a program of 400 500 7    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of 8    cosmetology or a licensed esthetics school and had 2 years 9    of practical experience as a licensed cosmetologist or 10    esthetician within 5 years preceding the examination; or 11    (ii) completed a program of 600 750 hours of teacher 12    training in a licensed school of cosmetology approved by 13    the Department to teach esthetics or a licensed esthetics 14    school;15        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 16    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 17    as a licensed cosmetology or esthetics teacher; 18        (6) (blank); and19        (7) has met any other requirements as required by this 20    Act.21    (b) (Blank).22    (c) An applicant who is issued a license as an esthetics 23teacher is not required to maintain an esthetics license in 24order to practice as an esthetician as defined in this Act.25(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.)   HB3854- 19 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3A-5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-5)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3A-5. Examination. 4    (a) The Department shall authorize examinations of 5applicants for a license as an esthetician or teacher of 6esthetics at such times and places as it may determine. The 7Department shall authorize no fewer than 4 examinations for a 8license as an esthetician or a teacher of esthetics in a 9calendar year. An applicant for licensure as an esthetician 10who has completed 480 600 hours in the study of esthetics may 11take the examination. 12    If an applicant neglects, fails without an approved 13excuse, or refuses to take the next available examination 14offered for licensure under this Act, the fee paid by the 15applicant shall be forfeited to the Department and the 16application denied. If an applicant fails to pass an 17examination for licensure under this Act within 3 years after 18filing his or her application, the application shall be 19denied. However, such applicant may thereafter make a new 20application for examination, accompanied by the required fee, 21if he or she meets the requirements in effect at the time of 22reapplication. If an applicant for licensure as an esthetician 23is unsuccessful at 3 examinations conducted by the Department, 24the applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 25furnish evidence of not less than 100 125 hours of additional 26study of esthetics in an approved school of cosmetology or   HB3854- 20 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1esthetics since the applicant last took the examination. If an 2applicant for licensure as an esthetics teacher is 3unsuccessful at 3 examinations conducted by the Department, 4the applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 5furnish evidence of not less than 64 80 hours of additional 6study in teaching methodology and educational psychology in a 7licensed school of cosmetology or esthetics since the 8applicant last took the examination. An applicant who fails to 9pass a fourth examination shall not again be admitted to an 10examination unless (i) in the case of an applicant for 11licensure as an esthetician, the applicant shall again take 12and complete a program of 600 750 hours in the study of 13esthetics in a licensed school of cosmetology approved to 14teach esthetics or a school of esthetics, extending over a 15period that commences after the applicant fails to pass the 16fourth examination and that is not less than 18 weeks nor more 17than 4 consecutive years in duration; or (ii) in the case of an 18applicant for a license as an esthetics teacher, the applicant 19shall again take and complete a program of 600 750 hours of 20teacher training in a school of cosmetology approved to teach 21esthetics or a school of esthetics, except that if the 22applicant had 2 years of practical experience as a licensed 23cosmetologist or esthetician within 5 years preceding the 24initial examination taken by the applicant, the applicant must 25again take and complete a program of 400 500 hours of teacher 26training in licensed cosmetology or a licensed esthetics   HB3854- 21 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1school.2    (b) Each applicant shall be given a written examination 3testing both theoretical and practical knowledge which shall 4include, but not be limited to, questions that determine the 5applicant's knowledge, as provided by rule.6    (c) The examination of applicants for licensure as an 7esthetics teacher may include:8        (1) teaching methodology;9        (2) classroom management; and10        (3) record keeping and any other subjects that the 11    Department may deem necessary to insure competent 12    performance.13    (d) This Act does not prohibit the practice of esthetics 14by one who has applied in writing to the Department, in form 15and substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as 16an esthetician or an esthetics teacher and has complied with 17all the provisions of this Act in order to qualify for a 18license, except the passing of an examination to be eligible 19to receive such license certificate, until: (i) the expiration 20of 6 months after the filing of such written application, or 21(ii) the decision of the Department that the applicant has 22failed to pass an examination within 6 months or failed 23without an approved excuse to take an examination conducted 24within 6 months by the Department, or (iii) the withdrawal of 25the application.26(Source: P.A. 100-642, eff. 1-1-19; 100-934, eff. 1-1-19.)   HB3854- 22 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3C-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-2)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3C-2. License; qualifications. A person is qualified 4to receive a license as a nail technician if that person 5applies in writing on forms provided by the Department, pays 6the required fee, and: 7        (a) Is at least 16 years of age; 8        (b) Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 9    or has a certificate of graduation from a school providing 10    secondary education or the recognized equivalent of that 11    certificate; 12        (c) Has graduated from a school of cosmetology or 13    school of nail technology approved by the Department, 14    having completed a program of 280 350 hours in the study of 15    nail technology extending over a period of not less than 8 16    weeks nor more than 2 consecutive years; 17        (d) Has passed an examination authorized by the 18    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 19    as a nail technician; and 20        (e) Has met any other requirements of this Act.21    Time spent in the study of nail technology under the laws 22of another state or territory of the United States, or of a 23foreign country or province, shall be credited toward the 24period of study required by the provisions of subsection (c).25(Source: P.A. 94-451, eff. 12-31-05.)   HB3854- 23 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3C-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-3)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3C-3. Licensure as a nail technology teacher; 4qualifications.5    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as a nail 6technology teacher if that person has filed an application on 7forms provided by the Department, paid the required fee, and:8        (1) is at least 18 years of age;9        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;10        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist or nail 11    technician;12        (4) has either: (1) completed a program of 400 500 13    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of nail 14    technology or cosmetology, and had 2 years of practical 15    experience as a nail technician; or (2) has completed a 16    program of 600 625 hours of teacher training in a licensed 17    school of cosmetology approved to teach nail technology or 18    school of nail technology; and19        (5) who has passed an examination authorized by the 20    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 21    as a cosmetology or nail technology teacher.22    (b) An applicant who receives a license as a nail 23technology teacher shall not be required to maintain a license 24as a nail technician.25(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.)   HB3854- 24 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3C-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-7)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3C-7. Examinations; failure or refusal to take 4examination. The Department shall authorize examinations of 5applicants for licenses as nail technicians and teachers of 6nail technology at the times and places as it may determine. An 7applicant for licensure as a nail technician who has completed 8224 280 hours in the study of nail technology may take the 9examination. 10    The Department shall authorize not less than 4 11examinations for licenses as nail technicians, and nail 12technology teachers in a calendar year.13    If an applicant neglects, fails without an approved 14excuse, or refuses to take the next available examination 15offered for licensure under this Act, the fee paid by the 16applicant shall be forfeited to the Department and the 17application denied. If an applicant fails to pass an 18examination for licensure under this Act within 3 years after 19filing an application, the application shall be denied. 20Nevertheless, the applicant may thereafter make a new 21application for examination, accompanied by the required fee, 22if he or she meets the requirements in effect at the time of 23reapplication. If an applicant for licensure as a nail 24technician or nail technology teacher is unsuccessful at 3 25examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant shall,   HB3854- 25 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1before taking a subsequent examination, furnish evidence of 2successfully completing (i) for a nail technician, not less 3than 48 60 hours of additional study of nail technology in a 4licensed school of cosmetology approved to teach nail 5technology or nail technology and (ii) for a nail technology 6teacher, not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in 7teaching methodology and educational psychology in an approved 8school of cosmetology or nail technology since the applicant 9last took the examination.10    An applicant who fails the fourth examination shall not 11again be admitted to an examination unless: (i) in the case of 12an applicant for a license as a nail technician, the applicant 13again takes and completes a total of 280 350 hours in the study 14of nail technology in an approved school of cosmetology or 15nail technology extending over a period that commences after 16the applicant fails to pass the fourth examination and that is 17not less than 8 weeks nor more than 2 consecutive years in 18duration; or (ii) in the case of an applicant for licensure as 19a nail technology teacher, the applicant again takes and 20completes a program of 500 625 hours of teacher training in a 21licensed school of cosmetology, or nail technology, except 22that if the applicant had 2 years of practical experience as a 23licensed nail technician within 5 years preceding the initial 24examination taken by the applicant, the applicant must again 25take and complete a program of 400 500 hours of teacher 26training in a licensed school of cosmetology approved to teach   HB3854- 26 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1nail technology, or a licensed school of nail technology.2    Each applicant for licensure as a nail technician shall be 3given a written examination testing both theoretical and 4practical knowledge, which shall include, but not be limited 5to, questions that determine the applicant's knowledge of 6product chemistry, sanitary rules, sanitary procedures, 7hazardous chemicals and exposure minimization, this Act, and 8labor and compensation laws.9    The examination for licensure as a nail technology teacher 10may include knowledge of the subject matter, teaching 11methodology, classroom management, record keeping, and any 12other subjects that the Department in its discretion may deem 13necessary to insure competent performance.14    This Act does not prohibit the practice of nail technology 15by a person who has applied in writing to the Department, in 16form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for a 17license as a nail technician, or the teaching of nail 18technology by one who has applied in writing to the 19Department, in form and substance satisfactory to the 20Department, for a license as a nail technology teacher, if the 21person has complied with all the provisions of this Act in 22order to qualify for a license, except the passing of an 23examination to be eligible to receive a license, until: (a) 24the expiration of 6 months after the filing of the written 25application, or (b) the decision of the Department that the 26applicant has failed to pass an examination within 6 months or   HB3854- 27 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1failed without an approved excuse to take an examination 2conducted within 6 months by the Department, or (c) the 3withdrawal of the application.4(Source: P.A. 100-642, eff. 1-1-19; 100-934, eff. 1-1-19.) 5    (225 ILCS 410/3E-2)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)7    Sec. 3E-2. Hair braider licensure; qualifications.8    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as a hair 9braider if he or she has filed an application on forms provided 10by the Department, paid the required fees, and meets the 11following qualifications:12        (1) Is at least 16 years of age;13        (2) Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 14    or has received a certificate of graduation from a school 15    providing secondary education, or the recognized 16    equivalent of that certificate; and17        (3) Has completed a program consisting of a minimum of 18    240 300 clock hours or an 8 a 10 credit hour equivalency of 19    instruction, as defined by rule, in a licensed cosmetology 20    school teaching a hair braiding curriculum or in a 21    licensed hair braiding school as follows:22            (A) Basic training consisting of 28 35 hours of 23        classroom instruction in general theory, practical 24        application, and technical application in the 25        following subject areas: history of hair braiding,   HB3854- 28 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1        personal hygiene and public health, professional 2        ethics, disinfection and sanitation, bacteriology, 3        disorders and diseases of the hair and scalp, OSHA 4        standards relating to material safety data sheets 5        (MSDS) on chemicals, hair analysis and scalp care, and 6        technical procedures;7            (B) Related concepts consisting of 28 35 hours of 8        classroom instruction in the following subject areas: 9        Braid removal and scalp care; basic styling knowledge; 10        tools and equipment; growth patterns, styles and 11        sectioning; client consultation and face shapes; and 12        client education, pre-care, post-care, home care and 13        follow-up services;14            (C) Practices and procedures consisting of 160 200 15        hours of instruction, which shall be a combination of 16        classroom instruction and clinical practical 17        application, in the following subject areas: single 18        braids with and without extensions; cornrows with and 19        without extensions; twists and knots; multiple 20        strands; hair locking; weaving/sewn-in; other 21        procedures as they relate to hair-braiding; and 22        product knowledge as it relates to hair braiding; and23            (D) Business practices consisting of 24 30 hours 24        of classroom instruction in the following subject 25        areas: Illinois Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 26        Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 and Rules;   HB3854- 29 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1        salon management; human relations and salesmanship; 2        and Workers' Compensation Act.3    (b) The expiration date and renewal period for each 4license issued under this Act shall be set by rule. 5    (c) Within 2 years after the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the Department 7may issue a hair braider license to any applicant who does not 8meet the requirements of items (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of 9this Section if the applicant: (1) files an application in 10accordance with subsection (a), (2) pays the required fee, (3) 11has not committed an offense that would be grounds for 12discipline under this Act, and (4) is able to demonstrate to 13the Department through tax records or affidavits that he or 14she has practiced hair braiding for at least 2 consecutive 15years immediately prior to the date of his or her application.16    A hair braider who obtains his or her license under this 17subsection (c) may renew his or her license if he or she 18applies to the Department for renewal and has completed at 19least 52 65 hours of relevant training in health, safety, 20hygiene, and business management in accordance with the 21requirements of this Section or any rule adopted pursuant to 22this Section. A hair braider who renews his or her license 23under this subsection (c) may thereafter only renew his or her 24license if he or she meets the requirements of Section 3E-5 of 25this Act.26(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.)   HB3854- 30 -LRB104 10943 AAS 21025 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3E-3)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3E-3. Hair braiding teacher licensure. A hair 4braiding teacher license shall be made available by the 5Department. The qualifications for a hair braiding teacher 6license shall be provided by rule, and shall include at least 7600 clock hours or a 16 20 credit hour equivalency in relevant 8teaching methods and curriculum content, or at least 400 500 9clock hours of hair braiding teacher training for an 10individual who is able to establish that he or she has had at 11least 2 years of practical experience.12(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11.)